Utah statutes.
53-3-804.   Application for identification card -- Required information -- Release of anatomical gift information.

(1)  To apply for an identification card or limited-term identification card, the applicant shall:

(a)  be a Utah resident;

(b)  have a Utah residence address; and

(c)  appear in person at any license examining station.

(2)  The applicant shall provide the following information to the division:

(a)  true and full legal name and Utah residence address;

(b)  date of birth as set forth in a certified copy of the applicant's birth certificate, or other satisfactory evidence of birth, which shall be attached to the application;

(c) (i)  Social Security number; or

(ii)  written proof that the applicant is ineligible to receive a Social Security number;

(d)  place of birth;

(e)  height and weight;

(f)  color of eyes and hair;

(g)  signature;

(h)  photograph;

(i)  evidence of the applicant's lawful presence in the United States by providing documentary evidence:

(i)  that a person is:

(A)  a United States citizen;

(B)  a national; or

(C)  a legal permanent resident alien; or

(ii)  of the applicant's:

(A)  unexpired immigrant or nonimmigrant visa status for admission into the United States;

(B)  pending or approved application for asylum in the United States;

(C)  admission into the United States as a refugee;

(D)  pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States;

(E)  approved deferred action status; or

(F)  pending application for adjustment of status to legal permanent resident or conditional resident;

(j)  an indication whether the applicant intends to make an anatomical gift under Title 26, Chapter 28, Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act;

(k)  an indication whether the applicant is required to register as a sex offender under Section 77-27-21.5; and

(l)  an indication whether the applicant is a military veteran and does or does not authorize sharing the information with the state Department of Veterans' Affairs.

(3)  The requirements of Section 53-3-234 apply to this section for each person, age 16 and older, applying for an identification card.  Refusal to consent to the release of information shall result in the denial of the identification card.

(4)  A person who knowingly fails to provide the information required under Subsection (2)(k) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

